dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
  <!-- सामुन्ने; सामुन्ने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सामुन्ने__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ग्रामभन्दा; ग्रामभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ग्रामभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अती; अती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अती__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वहुत; वहुत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वहुत__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पुलूक्क; पुलूक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पुलूक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यसवखत; त्यसवखत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यसवखत__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रातःकालीन; प्रातःकालीन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रातःकालीन__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछि-; पछि-; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पछि-__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अघि-अघि; अघि-अघि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अघि-अघि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दृष्टिभ्रमभन्दा; दृष्टिभ्रमभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दृष्टिभ्रमभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- क्षणभर; क्षणभर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="क्षणभर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहिलै; पहिलै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहिलै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बस्नुभन्दा; बस्नुभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बस्नुभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहिले; पहिले; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहिले__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहिले; पहिले; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहिले__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टम्म; टम्म; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टम्म__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जबर्जस्ती; जबर्जस्ती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जबर्जस्ती__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिरिमिरी; तिरिमिरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिरिमिरी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसैगरी; यसैगरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसैगरी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसैगरी; यसैगरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसैगरी__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खूब; खूब; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खूब__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यस्तैगरी; यस्तैगरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यस्तैगरी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गुर्लुम; गुर्लुम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गुर्लुम__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिरूद्ध; बिरूद्ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिरूद्ध__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिनहुँ; दिनहुँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दिनहुँ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तुरुन्त; तुरुन्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तुरुन्त__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लगभग; लगभग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लगभग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फिटीक्क; फिटीक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फिटीक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नजीक; नजीक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नजीक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वल्ल; वल्ल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वल्ल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बितुञ्जेल; बितुञ्जेल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बितुञ्जेल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छि; छि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अदि; अदि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अदि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसवीच; यसवीच; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसवीच__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झट्ट; झट्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झट्ट__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जवरजस्ती; जवरजस्ती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जवरजस्ती__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छक; छक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वास्तबमा; वास्तबमा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वास्तबमा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नजिक; नजिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नजिक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकाधिक; एकाधिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एकाधिक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यसोभए; त्यसोभए; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यसोभए__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यतिखेर; यतिखेर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यतिखेर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यतिखेर; यतिखेर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यतिखेर__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वारिपारी; वारिपारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वारिपारी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ट्याम्मै; ट्याम्मै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ट्याम्मै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="सामुन्ने"><i>सामुन्ने</i><par n="सामुन्ने__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ग्रामभन्दा"><i>ग्रामभन्दा</i><par n="ग्रामभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अती"><i>अती</i><par n="अती__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वहुत"><i>वहुत</i><par n="वहुत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पुलूक्क"><i>पुलूक्क</i><par n="पुलूक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यसवखत"><i>त्यसवखत</i><par n="त्यसवखत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रातःकालीन"><i>प्रातःकालीन</i><par n="प्रातःकालीन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पछि-"><i>पछि-</i><par n="पछि-__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अघि-अघि"><i>अघि-अघि</i><par n="अघि-अघि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दृष्टिभ्रमभन्दा"><i>दृष्टिभ्रमभन्दा</i><par n="दृष्टिभ्रमभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्षणभर"><i>क्षणभर</i><par n="क्षणभर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिलै"><i>पहिलै</i><par n="पहिलै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बस्नुभन्दा"><i>बस्नुभन्दा</i><par n="बस्नुभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिले"><i>पहिले</i><par n="पहिले__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिले"><i>पहिले</i><par n="पहिले__"/></e>
    <e lm="टम्म"><i>टम्म</i><par n="टम्म__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जबर्जस्ती"><i>जबर्जस्ती</i><par n="जबर्जस्ती__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तिरिमिरी"><i>तिरिमिरी</i><par n="तिरिमिरी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यसैगरी"><i>यसैगरी</i><par n="यसैगरी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यसैगरी"><i>यसैगरी</i><par n="यसैगरी__"/></e>
    <e lm="खूब"><i>खूब</i><par n="खूब__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यस्तैगरी"><i>यस्तैगरी</i><par n="यस्तैगरी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="गुर्लुम"><i>गुर्लुम</i><par n="गुर्लुम__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बिरूद्ध"><i>बिरूद्ध</i><par n="बिरूद्ध__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दिनहुँ"><i>दिनहुँ</i><par n="दिनहुँ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तुरुन्त"><i>तुरुन्त</i><par n="तुरुन्त__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लगभग"><i>लगभग</i><par n="लगभग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फिटीक्क"><i>फिटीक्क</i><par n="फिटीक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नजीक"><i>नजीक</i><par n="नजीक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वल्ल"><i>वल्ल</i><par n="वल्ल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बितुञ्जेल"><i>बितुञ्जेल</i><par n="बितुञ्जेल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="छि"><i>छि</i><par n="छि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अदि"><i>अदि</i><par n="अदि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यसवीच"><i>यसवीच</i><par n="यसवीच__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="झट्ट"><i>झट्ट</i><par n="झट्ट__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जवरजस्ती"><i>जवरजस्ती</i><par n="जवरजस्ती__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="छक"><i>छक</i><par n="छक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वास्तबमा"><i>वास्तबमा</i><par n="वास्तबमा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नजिक"><i>नजिक</i><par n="नजिक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एकाधिक"><i>एकाधिक</i><par n="एकाधिक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यसोभए"><i>त्यसोभए</i><par n="त्यसोभए__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यतिखेर"><i>यतिखेर</i><par n="यतिखेर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यतिखेर"><i>यतिखेर</i><par n="यतिखेर__"/></e>
    <e lm="वारिपारी"><i>वारिपारी</i><par n="वारिपारी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ट्याम्मै"><i>ट्याम्मै</i><par n="ट्याम्मै__adv"/></e>
